Utah statutes.
55-5-7.   Agencies to negotiate for food service with the Division of Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired -- Existing contracts.

(1)  A governmental agency which proposes to operate or continue a food service in a public office building shall first attempt in good faith to make an agreement with the Division of Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired to operate the food service without payment of rent.

(2)  The governmental agency may not offer or grant to any other party a contract or concession to operate the food service unless the governmental agency determines in good faith that the Division of Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired is not willing to or cannot satisfactorily provide the food service.

(3)  This act may not impair any valid contract existing on the effective date of this act, and does not preclude renegotiation of a valid contract on the same terms and with the same parties.



Amended by Chapter 10, 1997 General Session

